Hawaii statutes.
§476-26 Removal; member of armed forces.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 476-25, a member of the armed forces
of the United States on active duty who is a buyer of a motor vehicle under a
contract, without the consent of the seller, may remove the motor vehicle from
the island in which the motor vehicle was first kept for use by the buyer after
sale if the buyer was a member of the armed forces of the United States on
active duty at the time of execution of the contract and if such buyer has been
reassigned to a different county, state, or country by competent government
orders, unless the seller and buyer execute an agreement, separate and apart
from the contract in respect of which it applies, stating that the motor
vehicle may not be removed or stating the terms and conditions under which it
may be removed. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 286-57, a member of
the armed forces of the United States under contract with an out-of-state
dealer or financial institution identified as the lien holder of record on a
vehicle registration or vehicle title may remove said vehicle from the State
without the consent of the seller. [L 1967, c 246, §§1, 2; HRS §476-31; am and
ren L 1984, c 86, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 45, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next